California statutes. Public Contract Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 636, Sec. 7.   (SB 835)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Materials, Goods, and Services [10507.5. - 10510.]

10507.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the procurement of recycled paper products by the University of California by developing guidelines to encourage the procurement of recycled paper products where suitable for the uses intended and where the quality is equal and the price is equal or less than nonrecycled paper products. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the regents report annually to the Legislature, the Governor, and the California Integrated Waste Management Board commencing January 1, 1991, on the percentage of the total dollar amount of recycled paper products purchased or procured under this article.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1094) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   Effective September 5, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.7.

Except as provided for in this article, the Regents of the University of California shall let all contracts involving an expenditure of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) annually for goods and materials to be sold to the University of California to the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications, or else reject all bids. Contracts for services to be performed, other than personal or professional services, involving an expenditure of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more annually shall be made or entered into with the lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications, or else all bids shall be rejected. If the regents deem it to be for the best interest of the university, the regents may, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder
 for materials, goods, or services to execute a tendered contract, award it to the second lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications. If the second lowest responsible bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the regents may likewise award it to the third lowest responsible bidder meeting specifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.8.

(a) As provided for in this article, when the University of California determines that it can expect long-term savings through the use of life-cycle cost methodology, the use of more sustainable goods and materials, and reduced administrative costs, the lowest responsible bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the university. In order to implement this method of selection, the Regents of the University of California shall adopt and publish policies and guidelines for evaluating bidders that ensure that best value selections by the university are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These policies and guidelines shall conform to the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) and shall be applicable to the university when using best value as the bid evaluation methodology.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Best value” means the most advantageous balance of price, quality, service, performance, and other elements, as defined by the university, achieved through methods in accordance with this section and determined by objective performance criteria that may include price, features, long-term functionality, life-cycle costs, overall sustainability, and required services.

(2) “Best value agreement” means an agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(3) “Best value awardee” means the lowest responsible bidder or bidders that are awarded an agreement for goods, materials, or services that was awarded through the use of best value for the bid evaluation
 methodology.

(4) “Best value criteria” means those criteria set forth in subdivision (d).

(5) “University” means all current campuses and locations of the University of California, including the medical centers, the national laboratories, and any future University of California campuses and locations.

(c) (1) The university shall consider all of the following when adopting policies and guidelines pursuant to subdivision (a):

(A) Price and service proposals that reduce the university’s overall operating costs.

(B) Supply and material standards that support the university’s strategic sourcing initiatives.

(C) A procedure for bid protest and resolution.

(2) The university shall award a best value agreement as follows:

(A) The university shall evaluate bidders based solely upon the best value criteria set forth in the solicitation documents. Solicitation for bids shall describe the best value criteria that the university will consider in evaluating the bidders by overall category and by specific attributes.

(B) The university shall award the agreement to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders whose bid or bids are determined by the university to be the best value in terms of price, quality, service, and performance, and that meet the university’s requirements.

(C) Bid participants that are not awarded a best value agreement shall be notified
 in writing at the end of the agreement award process.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the university may take into consideration any of the following best value criteria when awarding a best value agreement for goods, materials, and services:

(1) The total cost to the university of its use or consumption of goods, materials, and services.

(2) The operational cost or benefit incurred by the university as a result of a contract award.

(3) The added value to the university, as defined in the request for proposal, of vendor-added services.

(4) The quality and effectiveness of goods, materials, and services.

(5) The use of
 more sustainable goods and materials in the manufacturing of the goods and materials and the packaging of these products.

(6) The reliability and timeliness of delivery and installation.

(7) The terms and conditions of product warranties, maintenance, and vendor guarantees.

(8) The vendor’s quality assurance, continuous improvement, and business resumption programs and their benefit to the university.

(9) The vendor’s experience with the timely provision of goods, materials, and services.

(10) The consistency of quality and availability of the vendor’s proposed supplies, materials, and services with the university’s overall procurement program.

(11) The economic benefits to the local community, including, but not limited to, job creation or retention and the support of small and local businesses.

(e) The university shall ensure that all businesses have a fair and equitable opportunity to compete for, and participate in, the university best value bids and shall also ensure that discrimination in the award and performance of the agreement does not occur on the basis of gender, marital status, ancestry, medical condition, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, or retaliation for having filed a discrimination complaint or protest in the performance of university contractual obligations.

(f) This section applies solely to the procurement of goods, materials, or services and shall not apply to construction contracts.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article is not intended to change in any manner any guideline, criteria, procedure, or requirement of the Regents of the University of
 California to let any contract for goods, materials, or services to the lowest responsible bidder meeting certain specifications or to reject all bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 3186)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.

The requirements of this article shall not be applicable when the regents determine that a brand or trade name article, thing, or product or proprietary service is the only one which will properly meet the needs of the University of California because the item or service is unique, available only from a sole source, or is designated to match others, used in, or furnished to, a particular installation, facility, or location. Contracts for unique products or services, or personal or professional services, shall not be made unless the regents determine that the proposed price therefor is reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, the advertising, bidding, and protest provisions of Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 10500), the University of California may award a contract for the acquisition of goods, services, or information technology that has an estimated value of greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), but less than two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000), to a certified small business, including a microbusiness, or to a disabled veteran business enterprise, if the University of California obtains price
 quotations from two or more certified small businesses, including microbusinesses, or from two or more disabled veteran business enterprises.

(b) In carrying out subdivision (a), the University of California shall consider a responsive offer timely received from a responsible certified small business, including a microbusiness, or from a disabled veteran business enterprise.

(c) No provision of this section shall apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.   (AB 173)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.

The Regents of the University of California shall prescribe methods of procurement for goods, materials, and services to be purchased, including:

(a) Requirements for public advertisement where feasible and practicable or for solicitation from at least three sources in other cases.

(b) Bidder prequalification and evaluation standards.

(c) Guidelines for negotiating contracts for unique products or proprietary services.

(d) Procedures for solicitation of vendor and service contractor interest.

(e) Dissemination of award information.

(f) Such other matters as may encourage the receipt of the most favorable price and conditions of purchase by the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2024, the University of California shall not approve a health benefit plan contract for employees that does not comply with the contraceptive coverage requirements of Sections 1367.25 and 1367.255 of the Health and Safety Code Sections 10123.1945 and 10123.196 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 630, Sec. 19.   (SB 523)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.

The requirements of this article shall not be applicable to the procurement of goods, materials, or services funded exclusively by federal agencies to the extent that the requirements of this article are in conflict with mandatory requirements of such federal agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Contracts with Private Architects, Engineering, Environmental, Land Surveying, and Construction Project Management Firms [10510.4. - 10510.9.]

10510.4.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Firm” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity permitted by law to practice the profession of architecture, landscape architecture, engineering, environmental services, land surveying, or construction project management.

(b) “Architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, and land surveying services” include those professional services of an architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, or land surveying nature as well as incidental services that members of these professions and their employees may logically or justifiably perform.

(c) “Construction project management” means those services provided by a licensed architect, registered engineer, or licensed general contractor that meet the requirements of Section 10510.9 for management and supervision of work performed on university construction projects.

(d) “Environmental services” means those services performed in connection with project development and permit processing in order to comply with federal and state environmental laws. “Environmental services” also includes the processing and awarding of claims pursuant to Chapter 6.75 (commencing with Section 25299.10) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Real property development services” means those services undertaken by a real estate developer in connection with the development of a developer-owned project on land owned or controlled by the university, including, but not limited to, environmental analysis, landscape planning, site design, market and financial feasibility, and other incidental services that a real estate developer may perform for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.5.

(a) Selection by the University of California for professional services of private architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, real property development services, or construction project management firms shall be on the basis of demonstrated competence and on the professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services required. In order to implement this method of selection, the university shall adopt procedures that assure that these services are engaged on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications for the types of services to be performed and at fair and reasonable prices to the university. Furthermore, these procedures shall assure maximum participation of small business firms, as defined by the Director of General Services pursuant to Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(b) These procedures shall specifically prohibit practices that might result in unlawful activity including, but not limited to, rebates, kickbacks, or other unlawful consideration, and shall specifically prohibit university employees from participating in the selection process when those employees have a relationship with a person or business entity seeking a contract under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.6.

(a) The University of California shall follow this section in negotiating fees and executing a contract for professional consulting services of a private architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, land surveying, environmental, real property development services, or construction project management firm.

(b) After providing notification to the successful firm of its selection, the university shall provide written instructions for the negotiations that are to follow. These instructions shall provide the private consulting firm with necessary information that shall allow the negotiations to proceed in an orderly fashion. Negotiations shall begin within 14 days after the successful firm has been notified of its selection or upon receipt of the cost proposal. The contractor should be notified if additional time is necessary to begin negotiations.

(c) Upon the completion of negotiations, the university and the private firm shall proceed to execute a contract that the university shall complete within 45 days. The contractor should be notified if additional time is necessary to complete the contract. The university and private firm shall work together to ensure the successful delivery of the requested services in a timely fashion.

(d) In the event an impasse is reached in negotiations, the university may terminate negotiations and enter into negotiations with the next qualified firm, in the same manner as prescribed in Section 10510.8 with respect to management services contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.7.

(a) In the procurement of architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, real property development services, and construction project management services, the university shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data.

(b) (1) Statewide announcement of all projects requiring architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, real property development services, or construction project management services shall be made by the university through advertisements placed in the California State Contracts Register and in publications of the respective professional societies and organizations of persons that perform those services. Alternatively, the university may develop policies to provide for electronic statewide notice of the required announcements to ensure notification through, at a minimum, appropriate professional societies and organizations and the California State Contracts Register, to those persons that perform the services sought to be procured.

(2) The university, for each proposed project, shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the university, together with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding the proposed project.

(3) (A) The university, for each proposed project, shall conduct discussions with no less than three firms regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods of approach for furnishing the required services.

(B) The university shall select, from the firms with which it conducted discussions in order of preference, based upon criteria established and published by the university, no less than three of the firms deemed to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required.

(C) If a project announcement results in submissions from fewer than three qualified firms, the university may then select from the available qualified firms and shall document its efforts to receive submissions from additional firms.

(D) These procedures shall specifically prohibit practices that might result in unlawful activity including, but not limited to, rebates, kickbacks, or other unlawful consideration, and shall specifically prohibit university employees from participating in the selection process when those employees have a relationship with a person or business entity seeking a contract under this section.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to a contract for the services described in Section 10510.4 with a total contract cost of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, provided that the type of project for which the contract is awarded is identified by the university in an annual announcement, made in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (1), that identifies the project needs of the university that are projected to have a total contract price of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.8.

(a) The university shall negotiate a contract with the best qualified firm for architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, land surveying, real property development services, and construction project management services at compensation that the university determines is fair and reasonable to the University of California.

(b) Should the university be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm considered to be the most qualified, at a price the university determines to be fair and reasonable to the University of California, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated. The university shall then undertake negotiations with the second most qualified firm. Failing accord with the second most qualified firm, the university shall terminate negotiations. The university shall then undertake negotiations with the third most qualified firm.

(c) Should the university be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with any of the selected firms, the university shall select additional firms in order of their competence and qualification and continue negotiations in accordance with this article until an agreement is reached.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.9.

Any individual or firm proposing to provide construction project management services pursuant to this article shall provide evidence that the individual or firm and its personnel carrying out onsite responsibilities have expertise and experience in construction project design review and evaluation, construction mobilization and supervision, bid evaluation, project scheduling, cost-benefit analysis, claims review and negotiation, and general management and administration of a construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. University of California Vendors [10510.50. - 10510.54.]

10510.50.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Recovery of Earned but Unpaid Wages Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.51.

As used in this article:

(a) “Aggrieved employee” means either of the following:

(1) An employee against whom one or more alleged violations of this article was committed.

(2) A university employee coworker of an employee against whom one or more alleged violations of this article was committed who performs services for the university at or for the same university location or department as the employee.

(b) “Basic payroll information” means, for each vendor-supplied employee who performed services at any
 time during the preceding six-month period, the following information:

(1) The employee’s full name, job title, mobile telephone number, email address, and home address.

(2) Work location while performing services for the university.

(3) The employee’s hourly rate of pay while performing services for the university for each applicable pay period during the preceding six-month period.

(4) The hourly value of employer-provided benefits, if any, received by the employee while performing services for the university for each applicable pay period during the preceding six-month period.

(5) The
 employee’s hours of work while performing services for the university for each applicable pay period during the six-month period.

(c) “Contract” includes any written instrument, purchase order, change order, order, requisition, service agreement, or other written or electronic document, however titled, reflecting an agreement that the vendor will perform services or supply the university with employees to perform services in exchange for payment.

(d) “Employee” includes any contract worker, or individual employed by any vendor, or otherwise supplied to the university by any vendor, to perform services for the university. “Employee” also includes an individual treated by either the vendor, a subcontractor, or the university as an independent contractor. “Employee” does not
 include any individual who is a parent, spouse, child, or legally adopted child of the employer, any sole proprietor, or any individual with an ownership interest of 5 percent or more in the vendor.

(e) “Employer” means any person, as defined in Section 18 of the Labor Code, who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of any person.

(f) “Hourly value of employer-provided benefits” means the employer’s actual cost for the employee’s benefits, including, but not limited to, retirement, health, dental, vision,
 and life and disability benefits calculated as an hourly dollar amount. It does not include any paid time off or any payroll expenses required by law. For any employee who does not receive employer-provided benefits, the following shall apply:

(1) For health, dental, or vision benefits, the value of those benefits is the value of the health, dental, or vision benefits offered to an
 employee if all of the following are true:

(A) The employee is not a Medi-Cal beneficiary.

(B) The employee is offered but does not elect to receive employer-provided health, dental, or vision benefits.

(C) The employee would receive benefits equivalent to benefits provided to university employees performing the same work.

(2) For health, dental, or vision benefits, if the requirements of paragraph (1) are not met, the hourly value is zero dollars ($0).

(3) For all other employer-provided benefits, if an employee does not receive the benefit, for whatever reason, the hourly value is zero dollars ($0).

(g) “Joint labor-management committee” includes any joint labor-management committee or similar meeting body or committee established jointly by the university and the exclusive
 representative of university employees who perform the same or similar services as the employees performing services for the university.

(h) “Services” means work that is subject to university policy. “Services” includes services that have been customarily performed by bargaining unit employees of the university, including, but not limited to, the following services: cleaning, custodial, janitorial, or housekeeping services; food services; laundry services; grounds keeping; nonskilled crafts building maintenance; transportation and parking services; security services; billing and coding services; sterile processing; hospital and nursing assistant services; respiratory therapy; and medical imaging services. “Services” does not include financial investment or retirement planning advice, retirement plan recordkeeping, or asset
 management.

(i) “Subcontractor” means any person, employer, supplier of labor, staffing agency, temporary services employer, or other entity that performs services for the university or supplies employees to perform services, pursuant to a contract with a vendor.

(j) “Total compensation rate” means the employee’s hourly rate of pay plus the hourly value of employer-provided benefits, or the equivalent compensation.

(k) “University” means the University of California.

(l) “University policy” means a policy or collective bargaining agreement adopted or approved by the university that requires vendors to provide employees wages and benefits of equivalent value
 to the wages and benefits provided to university employees performing the same work.

(m) “Vendor” means contractor and includes any person,
 employer, supplier of labor, staffing agency, temporary services employer, labor broker, management services provider, or other entity that contracts with the university to provide services or to supply the university with its own employees or those of a subcontractor to perform services. “Vendor” also means any person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, or employee of a vendor. “Vendor” does not include a contractor in the construction industry. For purposes of this subdivision, “contractor in the construction industry” means an employer that provides work associated with construction, including work involving alteration, demolition, building, excavation, renovation, remodeling, maintenance, improvement, repair work, and any other work as described by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and other similar
 or related occupations or trades.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.52.

(a) A vendor that supplies the university with employees to perform services, shall provide those employees with written notice of the total compensation rate specified in the vendor’s contract with the university or required by university policy, whichever is higher, and the employee’s hourly rate of pay and hourly value of employer-provided benefits. The vendor shall provide employees with these notices at the time each employee is assigned to perform services for the university and thereafter, each January, and within seven days of a change to the employee’s hourly rate.

(b) (1) In January and July of each year, the vendor shall provide
 basic payroll information to the university and members of any joint labor-management committee. The vendor shall provide all employees who agree to perform services for the university or continue doing so with written notice of this requirement and the written notice shall also include the following text:
“Basic payroll information pertaining to all employees who accept an assignment or continue performing services for the University of California will be shared with the University of California and the organizations that represent University of California employees. The information that will be shared includes your full name, university work location, mobile telephone number, email address, and home address. The purpose of sharing this information is to ensure that the University of California and the organizations
 that represent University of California employees can contact you if they discover you have been paid less than required by the vendor’s contract with the university or university policy and so that the University of California can provide you with a timely offer of employment as soon as you become eligible.”
(2) Basic payroll information for an individual employee who performs services for the university shall also, upon request, be made available for inspection by that individual employee or that individual employee’s authorized representative or be furnished to that individual employee or that individual employee’s authorized representative.

(c) If an auditor, vendor, the university, or any other person conducts or receives an audit,
 verification, notice, report, or finding with regard to whether a vendor has compensated employees at the total compensation rate required by the vendor’s contract with the university or university policy, including the vendor’s failure to provide employees with any “wage and benefits parity” rate required by university policy, that audit, verification, notice, report, or finding shall be provided to the university and members of any joint labor-management committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.53.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any vendor to accept payment from the university pursuant to a contract for services if the vendor is performing services or supplying the university with employees to perform services who are paid less than the total compensation rate specified in the vendor’s contract with the university or required by university policy, whichever is higher.

(b) An aggrieved employee may bring a civil action, including on behalf of an employee or employees against whom a violation of this article was committed, against a vendor to recover compensation that has been earned but was not paid at the total compensation rate required by the vendor’s contract
 with the university or university policy, whichever is higher, or to enforce any other provision of this article.

(c) (1) Prior to bringing an action against a vendor, an aggrieved employee shall first provide a vendor with written notice of an alleged violation of this article. The notice shall include the names or other information sufficient to identify the employees against whom the alleged violations were committed, dates of employment, the period of alleged noncompliance, and contact information. The notice shall also provide the vendor with the opportunity to correct and cure the violation.

(2) If a vendor receives written notice pursuant to paragraph (1), the vendor shall provide a copy of the written notice to the president of the university within
 five business days of receipt.

(3) Upon providing written notice pursuant to paragraph (1), an aggrieved employee may file suit only if the vendor fails to provide documentation, within 60 days, demonstrating that each employee identified in the notice has been made whole, has been provided with the notices required by this article, and is receiving a total compensation rate no less than the rate specified in the vendor’s contract with the university or in university policy, whichever is higher.

(d) If a claimant prevails in an action brought under this section, the vendor shall notify the president of the university of the decision and the court shall order the following:

(1) Any vendor that supplies the university
 with any employee who is paid a total compensation rate less than the amount fixed by the vendor’s contract with the university or university policy to pay a penalty and restitution, as follows:

(A) For any initial violation of subdivision (a), one hundred dollars ($100) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which the employee is underpaid, not exceeding an aggregate penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) per employee. This amount shall be in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid compensation.

(B) For each subsequent violation of subdivision (a), two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each underpaid employee for each pay period for which the employee is underpaid, not exceeding an aggregate penalty of one thousand dollars ($1000) per employee. This
 amount shall be in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid compensation.

(C) For each knowing and intentional failure by a vendor to comply with Section 10510.52, fifty dollars ($50) per employee for the initial pay period in which a violation occurs and one hundred dollars ($100) per employee for each violation in a subsequent pay period, not exceeding an aggregate penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per employee. This amount shall be in addition to an amount sufficient to recover underpaid compensation.

(2) To the extent a vendor bills the university for services provided via an hourly bill rate, and to the extent a vendor fails to pay its employees the amount fixed by the vendor’s contract with the university or university policy, a court may, in its discretion,
 require that the vendor return to the university any amounts paid by the university to the vendor for services that exceed the amounts the vendor paid to its employees providing services for any payroll periods after January 1, 2024.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(e) Compensation and penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the employee against whom a violation of this article was committed.

(f) The remedies provided for in this section are in addition to any other remedies provided by law. The penalties provided for in this section are in addition to any other penalties provided by law except that an employee shall not also receive penalties provided for in subdivision (f) of Section 226
 or Section 1197.1 of the Labor Code.

(g) This section shall not preclude or alter the university’s ability to contract for services as permitted under existing policies or collective bargaining agreements, nor shall it preclude the university from hiring in emergency circumstances or to meet other staffing needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.54.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Real Property [10511. - 10513.]

10511.

(a) (1) The Regents of the University of California shall give public notice to bidders of the sale of University of California real property situated in California if the estimated value of the real property to be sold exceeds the amount specified in paragraph (2).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply to real property whose estimated value exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) net to the seller.

(b) Notice of
 the sale of real property shall be by publication a minimum of six times, between 2 and 12 weeks preceding the day set for receiving bids, as follows:

(1) A minimum of three times in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is situated.

(2) At least three times in a newspaper of general circulation in the City of Los Angeles, the City of San Diego, the City of San Francisco, or the City of Sacramento, whichever is deemed most appropriate by the regents.

(3) The published notices shall specify the general description of the property, the source for bid materials and information, and the date and place for the receiving of sealed bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   (AB 2726)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10512.

(a) On the date designated in the public notice, the sealed bids shall be publicly opened.

(b) (1) The regents shall accept in public the bid or proposal that it deems to offer the best combination of price, terms, and bidder’s qualifications to the university, or reject all bids or proposals.
 A bidder’s qualifications may include factors other than price and terms, such as the bidder’s ability to complete the transaction or to secure development entitlements.

(2) If a successful bidder fails to perform in the manner specified, the regents may, at their sole option and without further notice, accept, from those remaining bids or proposals submitted and opened in public pursuant to subdivision (a), the bid
 or proposal that it deems to offer the best combination of price, terms, and bidder’s qualifications to the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 361, Sec. 2.   (AB 2726)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10513.

The publication and award procedures set forth in this article shall not be applicable to any of the following:

(a) The sale of an undivided or fractional ownership interest in real property.

(b) A sale of a right of use in real property that is less than fee ownership.

(c) A sale of real property subject to title conditions or restrictions on the university’s ownership deriving from the origin of that ownership by gift, devise, or otherwise, if that sale would be inconsistent with those title conditions or restrictions.

(d) The disposition of real property acquired through exercise of a power of
 sale pursuant to a deed of trust, foreclosure, deed in lieu of foreclosure, transactions when property is accepted in settlement of a defaulted mortgage, legal settlement, or held as an asset in the university’s investment portfolio.

(e) A sale of public lands under the direction of the federal land agent.

(f) A sale to a person or entity who will dedicate the real property to public use.
